Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.470

Election of delegates—Administration.

The election of delegates to the convention must as far as practicable, be administered, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, in the same manner as a general election under the election laws of this state.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1436; 1965 c 9 s 29.74.070. Prior: 1933 c 181 s 4, part; RRS s 5249-4, part. Formerly RCW 29.74.070.]